Massachusetts, session 194th, H4507.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 31 of the General Laws or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, William Pilleri, a resident of the town of Arlington, may take the 
civil service examination for appointment to the position of firefighter in the town of Arlington, 
notwithstanding his having reached the age of 32.   

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage and shall expire on June 1, 2029.